fr: Services > Services d’entreprise: Ressources humaines et paie; Logistique et déménagements; Services de bureau; Services de sécurité
vi: Dịch vụ > Dịch vụ kinh doanh: Nguồn nhân lực & Tiền lương; Logistics & Loại bỏ; Dịch vụ văn phòng; Dịch vụ an ninh
en: Services > Business Services: Human Resources & Payroll; Logistics & Removals; Office Services; Security Services
nl: Diensten > Bedrijfsdiensten: Personeelszaken en payrolling; Logistiek en verhuizingen; Kantoordiensten; Beveiligingsdiensten
hu: Szolgáltatások > Üzleti szolgáltatások: Humánerőforrás és bérszámfejtés; Logisztika és eltávolítás; Irodai szolgáltatások; Biztonsági szolgáltatások
nb: Tjenester > Forretningstjenester: Menneskelige ressurser og lønn; Logistikk og flytting; Kontortjenester; Sikkerhetstjenester
th: บริการ > บริการทางธุรกิจ: ทรัพยากรบุคคลและบัญชีเงินเดือน; โลจิสติกส์และการกำจัด; บริการสำนักงาน; บริการรักษาความปลอดภัย
pt-BR: Serviços > Serviços prestados às empresas: Recursos Humanos e Folha de Pagamento; Logística e remoções; Serviços de escritório; Serviços de segurança
da: Service > Virksomhedsservice: HR og løn; Logistik og flytning; Kontortjenester; Sikkerhedstjenester
ko: 서비스 > 기업 서비스: 인사/급여; 물류/제거; 사무 업무 서비스; 보안 서비스
ro-RO: Servicii > Servicii pentru afaceri: Resurse umane și salarizare; Logistică și mutări; Servicii pentru birouri; Servicii de securitate
sl-SI: Storitve > Poslovne storitve: Človeški viri in izplačevanje plač; Logistika in selitve; Pisarniške storitve; Storitve varovanja
lt-LT: Paslaugos > Verslo paslaugos: Personalas ir darbo užmokesčio administravimas; Logistika ir perkraustymas; Biuro paslaugos; Saugos tarnybos
cs: Služby > Firemní služby: Lidské zdroje a mzdy; Logistika a stěhování; Služby pro kanceláře; Zabezpečovací služby
sk-SK: Servis > Obchodné služby: Ľudské zdroje a mzdy; Logistika a sťahovanie; Kancelárske služby; Bezpečnostné služby
pl: Usługi > Business Services: Zasoby ludzkie i płace; Logistyka i przeprowadzki; Usługi biurowe; Usługi bezpieczeństwa
fi: Huollot > Liikepalvelut: Henkilöstöhallinto ja palkanlaskenta; Logistiikka ja muutot; Toimistopalvelut; Turvallisuuspalvelut
zh-TW: 維修 > 商業服務: 人力資源/工資名單; 物流/搬遷; 辦公室服務; 保全服務
sv: Tjänster > Företagstjänster: HR och löneadministration; Logistik och flytt; Kontorstjänster; Säkerhetstjänster
es: Servicios > Servicios empresariales: Servicios de recursos humanos y nómina; Logística y mudanzas; Servicios de oficina; Servicios de seguridad
el: Υπηρεσίες > Υπηρεσίες επιχειρήσεων: Ανθρώπινοι πόροι & μισθοδοσία; Εφοδιαστική & μεταφορές; Υπηρεσίες γραφείου; Υπηρεσίες ασφαλείας
ru: Услуги > Услуги для бизнеса: Управление персоналом и расчет заработной платы; Логистика и переезды; Обслуживание офисов; Охрана и обеспечение безопасности
de: Dienstleistungen > Geschäftliche Dienstleistungen: Personalwesen und Gehaltsabrechnung; Logistik und Umzüge; Bürodienstleistungen; Sicherheitsdienstleistungen
hr-HR: Usluge > Poslovne usluge: Ljudski resursi i obračun plaća; Logistika i selidbe; Uredske usluge; Usluge osiguranja
zh-CN: 服务 > 商业服务: 人力资源/薪资; 物流/搬运; 办公服务; 安全服务
ja: サービス > ビジネスサービス: 人事&給与; 物流&移転; オフィスサービス; セキュリティサービス
bg-BG: Услуги > Бизнес услуги: Човешки ресурси и заплати; Логистика и премествания; Офис услуги; Служби за сигурност
pt-PT: Serviços > Serviços empresariais: Recursos humanos e folha de pagamentos; Logística e Remoções; Serviços para escritórios; Serviços de segurança
it: Servizi > Servizi commerciali: Risorse umane e contabilità; Logistica e traslochi; Servizi per uffici; Servizi di sicurezza
tr: Servisler > İş Hizmetleri: İnsan Kaynakları ve Bordro; Lojistik ve Taşıma; Ofis Hizmetleri; Güvenlik Hizmetleri